dev/mt_wiktionary/nounNoNumber.all.fat.dix
  <!-- Ċek; Ċek; 1 -->
    <pardef n="Ċek__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- Ċek; Ċek; 1 -->
    <pardef n="Ċek__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- rwol; rwol; 1 -->
    <pardef n="rwol__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- xemgħa; xemgħa; 1 -->
    <pardef n="xemgħa__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- pranzu; pranzu; 1 -->
    <pardef n="pranzu__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- konnotazzjoni; konnotazzjoni; 1 -->
    <pardef n="konnotazzjoni__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- Taljani; Taljani; 1 -->
    <pardef n="Taljani__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- fidda; fidda; 1 -->
    <pardef n="fidda__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- fidda; fidda; 1 -->
    <pardef n="fidda__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- gisem; gisem; 1 -->
    <pardef n="gisem__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- balluta; balluta; 1 -->
    <pardef n="balluta__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- Taljana; Taljana; 1 -->
    <pardef n="Taljana__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- Taljana; Taljana; 1 -->
    <pardef n="Taljana__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- frott; frott; 1 -->
    <pardef n="frott__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- frizzjoni; frizzjoni; 1 -->
    <pardef n="frizzjoni__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ġurnata; ġurnata; 1 -->
    <pardef n="ġurnata__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- daqna; daqna; 1 -->
    <pardef n="daqna__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ħġieġ; ħġieġ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="ħġieġ__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ħġieġ; ħġieġ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="ħġieġ__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- wiżgħa; wiżgħa; 1 -->
    <pardef n="wiżgħa__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- furnar; furnar; 1 -->
    <pardef n="furnar__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- furnar; furnar; 1 -->
    <pardef n="furnar__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- roża; roża; 1 -->
    <pardef n="roża__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- roża; roża; 1 -->
    <pardef n="roża__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ilbies; ilbies; 1 -->
    <pardef n="ilbies__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- griż; griż; 1 -->
    <pardef n="griż__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- widna; widna; 1 -->
    <pardef n="widna__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- għadira; għadira; 1 -->
    <pardef n="għadira__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- karbonju; karbonju; 1 -->
    <pardef n="karbonju__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- karbonju; karbonju; 1 -->
    <pardef n="karbonju__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- għajnuna; għajnuna; 1 -->
    <pardef n="għajnuna__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- Milied; Milied; 1 -->
    <pardef n="Milied__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- numru; numru; 1 -->
    <pardef n="numru__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- numru; numru; 1 -->
    <pardef n="numru__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- alġebra; alġebra; 1 -->
    <pardef n="alġebra__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- alġebra; alġebra; 1 -->
    <pardef n="alġebra__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- bijodiversità; bijodiversità; 1 -->
    <pardef n="bijodiversità__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- dalwaqt; dalwaqt; 1 -->
    <pardef n="dalwaqt__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- dalwaqt; dalwaqt; 1 -->
    <pardef n="dalwaqt__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ilħit; ilħit; 1 -->
    <pardef n="ilħit__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- nemla; nemla; 1 -->
    <pardef n="nemla__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- iben; iben; 1 -->
    <pardef n="iben__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="Ċek"><i>Ċek</i><par n="Ċek__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="Ċek"><i>Ċek</i><par n="Ċek__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="rwol"><i>rwol</i><par n="rwol__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="xemgħa"><i>xemgħa</i><par n="xemgħa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="pranzu"><i>pranzu</i><par n="pranzu__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="konnotazzjoni"><i>konnotazzjoni</i><par n="konnotazzjoni__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="Taljani"><i>Taljani</i><par n="Taljani__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="fidda"><i>fidda</i><par n="fidda__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="fidda"><i>fidda</i><par n="fidda__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="gisem"><i>gisem</i><par n="gisem__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="balluta"><i>balluta</i><par n="balluta__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="Taljana"><i>Taljana</i><par n="Taljana__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="Taljana"><i>Taljana</i><par n="Taljana__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="frott"><i>frott</i><par n="frott__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="frizzjoni"><i>frizzjoni</i><par n="frizzjoni__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ġurnata"><i>ġurnata</i><par n="ġurnata__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="daqna"><i>daqna</i><par n="daqna__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ħġieġ"><i>ħġieġ</i><par n="ħġieġ__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ħġieġ"><i>ħġieġ</i><par n="ħġieġ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="wiżgħa"><i>wiżgħa</i><par n="wiżgħa__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="furnar"><i>furnar</i><par n="furnar__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="furnar"><i>furnar</i><par n="furnar__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="roża"><i>roża</i><par n="roża__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="roża"><i>roża</i><par n="roża__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ilbies"><i>ilbies</i><par n="ilbies__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="griż"><i>griż</i><par n="griż__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="widna"><i>widna</i><par n="widna__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="għadira"><i>għadira</i><par n="għadira__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="karbonju"><i>karbonju</i><par n="karbonju__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="karbonju"><i>karbonju</i><par n="karbonju__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="għajnuna"><i>għajnuna</i><par n="għajnuna__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="Milied"><i>Milied</i><par n="Milied__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="numru"><i>numru</i><par n="numru__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="numru"><i>numru</i><par n="numru__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="alġebra"><i>alġebra</i><par n="alġebra__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="alġebra"><i>alġebra</i><par n="alġebra__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="bijodiversità"><i>bijodiversità</i><par n="bijodiversità__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="dalwaqt"><i>dalwaqt</i><par n="dalwaqt__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="dalwaqt"><i>dalwaqt</i><par n="dalwaqt__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ilħit"><i>ilħit</i><par n="ilħit__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="nemla"><i>nemla</i><par n="nemla__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="iben"><i>iben</i><par n="iben__n_GD"/></e>
